Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16B.363] ADVISORY COUNCIL ON COMMUNITY COLLABORATION, STABILITY, AND PREPAREDNESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership; staff support. new text end new text begin (a) The Advisory Council on Community Collaboration, Stability, and Preparedness consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) one member representing the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (2) one member representing the League of Minnesota Cities; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of public safety, or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (4) one member representing the Minnesota Chiefs of Police Association; new text end new text begin (5) one member representing the Minnesota Sheriffs' Association; new text end new text begin (6) the colonel of the Minnesota State Patrol, or the colonel's designee; new text end new text begin (7) one member representing licensed behavioral health practitioners, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (8) one member representing mediation and conflict resolution practitioners, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (9) one member with expertise in peace and diplomacy, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (10) one member with academic expertise in violence prevention, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (11) two representatives of community organizations that address community safety and de-escalation, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (12) one communications strategist with expertise in public messaging and addressing misinformation, appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (13) one legal expert in civil liberties, appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (14) one faith leader with a multifaith perspective, appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (b) In making appointments, the governor must ensure representation from greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) The Office of Collaboration and Dispute Resolution must provide meeting space and administrative and research support to the council. new text end new text begin (d) The council must elect a chair and vice-chair from among the membership at the first council meeting each odd-numbered year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The council must foster proactive collaboration between trusted community leaders and public officials and submit findings and recommendations to the legislature and the governor regarding preparedness for civil unrest and political instability in Minnesota. The council's findings and recommendations must address but are not limited to the following topics: new text end new text begin (1) shared principles and best practices for effective collaboration during times of unrest and community escalation; new text end new text begin (2) gaps and opportunities in current statewide civil unrest preparedness planning; new text end new text begin (3) recommended strategies for strengthening trust-building and communication between state and local elected officials, law enforcement, community leaders, and the public; and new text end new text begin (4) toolkits for community leaders to guide effective response, de-escalation, and coordination. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Meetings must be public. new text end new text begin Meetings of the council are subject to chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal. new text end new text begin The membership terms, compensation, and removal of members of the council are as provided in section 15.059. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin No later than February 1 each year, the council must submit a report to the legislature and the governor regarding the council's findings, recommendations, activities, and accomplishments during the previous calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires June 30, 20..... new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MINNESOTA COMMON GROUND TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership; chair. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota Common Ground Task Force consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the house minority leader; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the senate, one appointed by the senate majority leader and one appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (3) one member representing the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (4) one member representing the League of Minnesota Cities; new text end new text begin (5) one member representing school districts, appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (6) seven members appointed by the governor representing organizations with expertise in relevant areas, including but not limited to civic education and youth leadership, bridging urban-rural divides, political bipartisanship, civil discourse, interfaith understanding, and media and storytelling. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority must submit appointments to the commissioner of administration by August 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The Office of Collaboration and Dispute Resolution must provide meeting space and administrative and research support to the task force. The Office of Collaboration and Dispute Resolution must convene the first meeting by October 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (d) The task force members must elect a chair and a vice-chair from among the membership of the task force at the first meeting. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) develop specific policy recommendations to increase common ground and Minnesota's resilience to the impacts of polarization and social division; and new text end new text begin (2) review current policies and practices in the Minnesota legislature and make recommendations that support civility and effective bipartisan cogovernance within the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Meetings must be public. new text end new text begin Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. The task force must seek input from the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Compensation; removal. new text end new text begin The compensation and removal of members of the task force are as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2028, the task force must submit a report containing the policy recommendations developed under subdivision 2 to the legislature and the governor. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires on January 16, 2028, or the day after the task force submits the report required under subdivision 5, whichever occurs first. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin STUDY REQUIRED; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to study and report on the economic impacts of polarization and social division in Minnesota, including but not limited to lost productivity and absenteeism attributable to uncivil behavior in the workplace. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) By February 1, 2028, the commissioner must submit the report, including recommendations, to the legislature and the governor. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin CIVIL HEALTH DASHBOARD; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration for the Office of Collaboration and Dispute Resolution to create and maintain a public-facing civic health dashboard of data on the status of polarization, social cohesion, political violence, bipartisanship, and other metrics relevant to civic health in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin OFFICE OF COLLABORATION AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION CAPACITY INCREASED; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of administration to increase the capacity of the Office of Collaboration and Dispute Resolution in the following ways: new text end new text begin (1) promoting practical skill building and education about conflict resolution approaches for kindergarten through grade 12 students; new text end new text begin (2) expanding assistance to local governments on dispute resolution and providing additional dispute resolution training to local government staff and elected officials and their communities; new text end new text begin (3) expanding the use of community mediation and volunteer mediation models throughout Minnesota and ensuring all counties and regions of the state have access to low-cost mediation; and new text end new text begin (4) creating a position to mediate disputes that arise under the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin COMMUNITY MEDIATION AND ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION STRENGTHENED; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the state court administrator to strengthen the infrastructure and funding for community mediation and alternative dispute resolution statewide under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 494. new text end